output/hyph-id-gpu.pat.txt
% Hyphenation patterns for Indonesian
% Generated by OrthosGPU
\patterns{
a1a
aa3d
a3ad
aaf3
a3af
a3ah
a3al
a3an
aat3
a3at
a1b
a3ba
3abadi
aba3ha
abak3
ab3d
a3be
a3bi
abil3an
ab3j
ab3k
ab3l
a3bo
abo1
abo3l
abora3
ab3r
3abs
ab3s
1abs
a3bu
abur3
abur1
a1c
a3ca
acah3
acat3
a3ce
a3ci
aci3t
a3co
a3cu
3acung
a1d
a3da
3adaban
adap3
adap1
3adapt
a3de
a3di
adi3ha
3adil
1adil
adi3p
adisi3
ad3k
ad3m
a3do
ado3l
adop3
ad3r
a3du
adu3ta
ae1
a1e
a3e.
ae3d
a3en
ae3r
a3era
aero3
a3es
a1f
a3fa
a3fe
a3fi
afilia3
af3k
afo3
a3fo
a3fr
af3s
af3t
a1g
a3ga
agai3
agamo3
a3ge
ag3f
a3gi
agi1
agio3
agi3t
agita3
ag3m
agmen3
ag3n
a3go
agre3
a3gu
agus3
agut3
ah1
ahasa1
a3hay
ah3b
ahban3
ah3c
ah3d
a3he
ah3f
ah3g
a3hir
ah3k
ah3l
ah3m
ah3n
ah3p
ah3r
ah3s
ah3t
a3hu
ahu3l
ah3w
ah3y
ai1
ai3a
a3ib.
aibe3
ai3c
ai3d
a3id.
a3idah
ai3g
ai3j
ai3k
a3ik.
a1ik.
a1il
a3il.
a3in
a1in
ain3an
ai3p
a3ir
a1ir
a3is
a1is
a3it
a1it
aitul3
a1j
a3ja
ajam3
ajar3
ajar1
a3je
aje3m
a3ji
aj3n
a3ju
ak1
a3ka
akade3
ak3ag
akar3an
ak3b
ak3c
ak3d
a3ke
ak3f
ak3g
a3ki
aki3ra
akit3a
ak3j
ak3k
ak3l
ak3m
ak3n
a3ko
3akomo
ak3p
akpi3
ak3r
ak3s
3aksar
akse3
ak3t
3aktif
1aktif
3aktiv
aktu1
3aktual
a3ku
akua1
akui3
aku3ka
akumu3
3akumula
ak3w
ak3y
ak3z
a1l
a3la
alah3
alai3
al1an
alar1
alar3a
ala3ta
al3b
albi3
al3d
alde3
a3le
alek3
alelo3
al3f
alfa3
al3g
a3li
alih3
3alih
alih1
1alih
alir3
al3j
al3k
alkula3
al3l
al3m
al3n
alo3
a3lo
al3p
al3s
al3t
a3lu
alua3s
alur3
alur1
alut3
al3v
alve3
al3w
am1
a3ma
amah3
amai3
amasi3
am3b
ambar1
ambat3
ambat1
ambek3
ambo3r
ambut3
am3c
am3d
a3me
ameli3
am3f
a3mi
amili3
am3k
am3m
am3n
a3mo
am3p
ampir3
ampir1
ampur3
am3r
am3s
am3t
a3mu
1an.
a3na
anah3
anali3
3anali
an3an
an1an
anato3
an3b
an3c
anca3s
ancur3
ancur1
an3d
andar1
andas3
andi3k
a3ne
anega3
3aneh
3anek
aneka3
ane3m
ane3r
an3f
ang3
angam3
angan3
angan1
angat3
angat1
angbin3
angen3
anggal3
anggap3
anggo3t
3angina
angio3
angis3
angkal3a
angkul3
3angsur
an3h
a3ni
3aniay
ani3l
ani3m
anio3
an3j
anjar3
anjar1
anjur3
an3k
anko3
an3m
ano3
a3no
an3p
an3r
ans3l
ans3p
an3t
anti1
anti3s
3antisip
antun3a
a3nu
anu1
anut3
an3w
a3ny
an3z
a1o
a3o.
a3ok
a3on
apak3
ap3an
ap1an
apasi3t
ap3c
ap3d
a3pe
ap3g
ap3h
apha3
a3pi
apis3
ap3k
ap3l
ap1l
apo3
a3po
ap3ri
ap3s
ap3t
a3pu
apu3l
a3ra
arah3
ara3l
aran3s
aranti3
ar3b
ar3c
ar3d
ardi3
a3re
ar3f
ar3g
arga3
ar3h
arha3
a3ri
arian3i
aria3s
ari3m
aris1
ar3j
ar3k
arkeo3
arko3
ar3l
ar3m
arma3
armi3
ar3n
arna3
arni3
a3ro
ar3p
ar3s
arsi3n
3arsip
ar3t
arte3m
arte3n
arti3
3artia
artiku3
a3ru
arum3
aru3p
arut3
arut1
ar3v
ar3w
ar3y
ar3z
a1s
asah3
as3an
as3b
as3c
as3d
a3se
ase3t
as3g
as3h
a3si
asili3
3asimi
asi3ra
asis3
as3j
as3k
aski3
asku3
as3l
as3m
as3n
a3so
as3p
as3r
as3s
as3t
aste3n
a3su
asua3r
asuk3an.
asu3r
asu1r
3asura
asyara3
asyik3
3asyik
atah3
atama3ta
at3an
at3b
at3c
a3te
ate1
ate3l
ateri3
a3ti
ati3nga
atis1
at3j
at3k
at3l
at3m
at3n
a3to
ato3p
at3p
at3r
at1r
atri3
at3s
a3tu
atul1
at3w
at3y
au1
au3a
au3b
auda3
audi3
3audi
a3uh.
au3hi
au3i
a3uk.
au3ka
au3l
a3ul.
a3uli.
a3um.
aumul3
a3un
a1un
a3up.
a3ur
a1ur
a3us
a1us
au3sa
ausa3h
a1ut
a3ut.
aut3a
a3uta
auten3
au3ti
a3utk
a1v
ava3
a3va
a3ve
avi3
a3vi
avita3
a3vo
a1w
a3wa
awan3a
awan1a
a3we
awet3
3awet
a3wi
a3wu
a1y
a3ya
ayah3
ayap3
ayap1
ayar3
ayar1
ayat3a
ayau3
a3ye
a3yi
a3yo
a3yu
a1z
a3za
a3zi
az3m
a3zo
1ba
3ba.
3baa
ba3a
3bab
3bac
ba3c
3bad
ba3d
badi3
3bag
ba3g
bagi3
3bah
ba3hag
bahasa3
bahu3
3bai
ba3ik
ba1ik
3baj
ba3j
3bak
bakte3
bakte1
bakti3
3bal
bala3t
bale3
balik3
balik1
bam3
3bam
3ban
bangkit3
bangun3
ban3s
banyak3
3bap
3bar
bar3an
baris3
3bas
ba3sa
3bat
batas3
3bau
baur3
3baw
ba3w
3bay
ba3y
ba3z
b1d
b3da
b3di
be1
1be
3be.
3bea
be3a
3beb
be3b
bebas3
bebu3
3bec
be3c
3bed
be3d
bedil3
3beg
be3g
begi3
3beh
3bek
bekal3
bek3an
beker3
3bel
be3l
bela3k
belanja3
3ben
benar3
benar1
benda3
bende3
bentur3
ber3
3ber
bera1
bera3h
bera3l
bera3p
bercin3
berda3
berem3
bergon3
beri3t
berita3
berja3
berjela3
berka3p
berkeri3
berla3k
berla3p
berlim3
bermak3
berma3l
berne3
berni3
berpa3
bertam3
berte3k
beru3s
3bes
besar3
beser3
3bet
betul3
betul1
bi1
1bi
3bi.
3bia
bi3a
biak3
bia3sa
3bib
3bic
bi3c
bica3
3bid
bi3d
3bih
3bij
bi3j
3bik
biku3
3bil
bi3l
bili3
3bim
3bin
bina3
bina1
bio3
3bio
bi3o
3bir
biru3
3bis
bisik3
3bit
3biu
bi3u
bi3v
bi3y
b1j
b3ja
b3je
b1k
b3ka
b1l
3bla
1bla
blas3
blas1
3ble
1ble
b3li
b3lu
1bo
3bo.
3bob
bo3b
3boc
bo3c
3bod
bo3d
bo3f
3bog
bo3g
3boh
3boi
3boj
bo3j
3bok
3bol
3bom
3bon
3bor
3bos
3bot
3boy
bo3y
1br
b1r
brak3a
3bran
3brat
bra3t
3bre
b3ri
3bron
bruk3
3brun
b1s
b3sa
b3se
bsen3
bser3
bsi3
b3si
b3so
bso3l
b3st
bsti3
b1t
1bu
3bu.
3bua
bu3a
buat3
3bub
bu3b
3bud
bu3d
budak3
budi3
3bug
bu3g
buh3
3buh
3bui
bu3i
3buj
bu3j
3buk
buk1an
3bul
3bum
bu3m
bu1m
3bun
3bur
bur3i.
3bus
3but
bu3ti
bu3y
b1y
b3ya
byek3
1ca
3ca.
3caa
ca3a
3cab
ca3b
cabik3
3cac
ca3c
3cad
ca3d
3cag
ca3g
3cah
3cai
cair3
3cak
cak3an
cakap3
cakar3
cakup3
3cal
ca3l
cam3
3cam
3can
3cap
3car
3cas
3cat
catat3
catur3
catur1
cau3
3cau
3caw
ca3w
3cay
ca3y
caya3
caya1
ce1
1ce
3ce.
3ceb
ce3b
3cec
ce3c
3ced
ce3d
cede3
3ceg
ce3g
3ceh
3cek
3cel
ce3l
celi3n
3cem
cembu3r
cemburu3
3cen
cende3
cengke3
3cep
ce3p
cepat3
cepat1
3cer
cerah3
ceri3
cerita3
cermin3
cerna3
cero3
3cet
ce3w
1ci
3ci.
3cia
ci3a
ci3b
3cic
ci3c
3cid
3cih
3cik
3cil
cil3an
cil1an
3cin
cinta3
cinta1
3cip
cip3r
3cir
3cis
3cit
3ciu
ci3u
1co
3co.
3coa
co3a
3cob
cob3l
3coc
co3c
3coh
3cok
cok3a
3col
3com
3con
contoh3
3cop
co3p
3cor
co1r
coret3
3cos
3cot
1cr
3cra
1cu
3cu.
3cua
cu3a
cua3l
cu3b
3cuc
cu3c
cuh3
3cuh
3cui
3cuk
cu1k
cu3ka
3cul
3cum
3cun
3cup
3cur
curah3
curi3
cut3
3cut
cut1
1da
3da.
3daa
da3a
3dab
dab3an
3dad
da3d
dae3
da3e
3daf
3dag
da3g
3dah
dahu3
dai3
3dai
3dak
3dal
dalam3
dalu3
3dam
dam3an
3dan
dan3s
3dap
dapat3
3dar
dar3an
darat3
darul3
3das
dasi3
3dat
da3ta
3dau
3daw
da3w
3day
da3y
daya1
daya3k
d3dh
de1
1de
3de.
3dea
de3a
3deb
de3b
3dec
de3c
3ded
de3d
dedi3
3def
de3f
3deg
de3g
3deh
de3hi
3dek
dekap3
dekia3
dek3l
dekom3
dekon3
dekora3
deks3
3del
dele3
3dem
3den
den3an
dengar3
denti3f
deo3
3deo
de3o
3dep
de3p
depar3
depen3
depo3s
dep3r
dep1r
3der
derha3n
derma3
3des
de3s
desa3i
desi3m
3det
detek3
deu3
3dew
de3w
dewa3
di1
1di
3di.
3dia
di3a
diabe3
dia3t
dia1t
3dib
di3b
3did
di3d
didik3
3die
di3e
3dif
di3f
3dig
digi3
3dih
di3j
dija3
3dik
dikit1
3dil
dil3an
dil1an
dila3t
dilu3
3dim
di3m
dimen3
3din
dina3
dina1
dini3
dio3
3dio
di3o
diote3
3dip
dip3l
3dir
diri3
3dis
dis1
disin3
distri3
3dit
3diu
di3u
3div
di3v
3diw
di3w
d1k
d3ka
d1m
d3ma
dmi3
d3mi
1do
3do.
3doa
do3a
3dob
3dod
do3d
3dof
do3f
3dog
do3g
3doh
3doi
3dok
doku3
3dol
3dom
3don
done3
3dop
3dor
3dos
do3sk
3dot
dot3a
1dr
d1r
dra1
3dram
dra3m
drama3
drama1
3dring
dro3
d3ro
drogena3
3drun
1du
3du.
3dua
du3a
dua3d
3dub
3dud
du3d
3dug
du3g
3duh
3dui
du3i
3duk
duk1
3dul
3dum
3dun
3dup
dup1
dupli3
3dur
durha3
duri3
3dus
dustri3
3dut
dut1
du3y
d3wa
dwi3
ea1
e1a
e3a.
ea3d
e3ad
ea3g
e3ak
e3al
e3an
e3ar
ea3s
e3as
ea3t
e3at
ea3w
ea3y
e1b
e3ba
ebak3
ebal3a
ebar1
ebat1
ebat3a
eba3u
e3be
e3bi
ebih3
ebih1
eb3l
e3bo
eb3r
e3bu
ebu3l
eb3y
e1c
e3ca
ecah3
e3ce
e3ci
ecil3
ecil1
eci3p
e3co
e3cu
ecua3
e1d
e3da
eda3f
edah3
eda3t
e3de
ederha3
e3di
edia1
edia3s
edih3
edika3
edita3s
e3do
edot3
ed3r
e3du
eduh3
eduka3
edu3ka
ee3l
e1f
efa3
e3fa
efa1
e3fe
efe3r
efe1r
efi3
e3fi
efini3
efo3
e3fo
ef3ro
e1g
e3ga
egali3
e3ge
egeta3r
e3gi
egi1
egis3
egis1
egi3t
egiti3
egiti1
eg3m
egmen3
e3go
egra3
egre3
e3gu
egu3l
egula3
egula1
eha3b
eha3r
e3he
ehi1
eh3k
ehu3
e1i
e3im
e3in
ei3o
ei3r
ei1r
eis3
e3is
eis1
e1j
e3ja
ejawan3
e3je
e3ji
e3jo
ejo3l
e3ju
ejut3
e3ka
ekali3
ekam3an
ek3an.
ekap3a
ekat3
ekat1
ekaya3
ek3c
ek3d
e3ke
ek3g
e3ki
ek3k
ekla3
eklek3
ek3m
ek3n
e3ko
3ekono
1ekono
ek3r
ek1r
ek3s
3eksp
1eksp
3ekstra
ek3t
ekto3
e3ku
eku1
ekui3
eku3l
ekula3
eku3ra
e1l
e3la
ela3f
ela1k
elamat3
ela3nga
ela1p
elaras3
3elast
ela3ta
el3b
e3le
elega3s
3elekt
1elekt
elem3
ele3r
ele3s
ele3t
el3f
e3li
eli3d
eli3ha
eli3l
3elimi
el3k
el3m
e3lo
elom1
el3p
el3t
e3lu
elu1
elu3p
elu3r
el3v
e3ma
ema1
ema3g
ema3l
ema3t
ema3u
em3b
emba1
emba3l
emba3t
emba3u
embe3
embi3
embo1
embo3l
embri3
e3me
emen3
emen1
eme3nga
emerin3
em3f
emi3
e3mi
emo3
e3mo
em3p
empel3an
empet3
em3r
emra3
emro3
e3mu
emu3f
emu3k
emu3sa
em3v
e3na
ena3ha
enaik3
ena3ik
enam3
ena1p
ena3t
en3c
enca1
enca3ha
enca3i
enca3pa
enca3t
ence3
enco3l
enco3r
encu3
encu1
en3d
enda1
enda3l
endam3
ende3m
ende3r
endi3ngi
endi3r
endis3
endo3s
ene3
e3ne
enem3
enem1
eng3
enga1
e1nga
enga3i
engani3
enga3s
enga3ta
enggak3
engga3r
engga3s
enggen3
enggi3
enggi1
enggra3
enggu1
enggu3l
enggu3r
e3ngi
engi1s
engon3
engsa3r
engu3s
engu3ta
e3ni
enim3
enim1
en3j
enja3
enja1
enje3
enji1
enji3l
enju1
enju3l
enju3r
en3k
eno3
e3no
en3r
en3s
en3t
enta3s
e3nu
enu3k
enu1k
enum3
enu3t
enu1t
e3ny
enya1
enyam3
enya3r
enyatu3
enyo3
enyo1
enyu1
en3z
3enzi
eo1
e1o
e3o.
eo3a
e3oa
eo3b
e3ob
eo3d
e3od
eo3f
e3of
eo3g
e3og
eoge3
eogra3
eo3i
e3ok
eo3l
e3ol
eo3m
e3om
e3on
eonto3
eo3p
e3op
eo3r
e3or
eore3
eoro3
eo3s
e3os
eo3t
e3ot
e1p
e3pa
epak3
epas3
epat3a
e3pe
epe3m
e3pi
epi1
epi3g
ep3l
ep1l
e3po
epok3
epor3
ep3s
ep3t
e3pu
epuk3
er1
e3ra
erai3
er3akt
er3ala
eran3s
er3asin
era3ta
eratur3
er3b
erba3
erbo3l
er3c
er3d
erda3t
erdem1
erdu3
e3re
ere3nga
ere3r
er3f
er3g
ergan3
ergan1
ergo3
ergun3
er3h
e3ri
eriba3
erikat3
erim1
er3impi
eri3nga
eri3r
er3j
erja3u
er3k
erka1
erka3ta
erkom3
erkom1
er3l
er3m
erma3t
er3n
ernya3
e3ro
eroga3
er3ola
er3p
erpa3l
er3s
ersi3r
ersu3
er3t
erta3l
ertem3
erte3r
erte3t
e3ru
eru1
er3uba
erubah3
eru3l
er3ula
eru3pi
er3ur
er3v
er3w
erwa3
er3z
e1s
e3sa
esak3
esap3
esap1
esar3an
es3b
e3se
esek3
e3si
es3k
es3l
es3m
e3so
es3p
es3r
esra3
es3t
esta3
este3
esti3
esti1
e3su
esu3ka
e1t
e3ta
eta3il
eta1r
e3te
etem3
e3ti
etio3
etisa3
et3k
et3n
3etni
e3to
et3r
et1r
et3s
e3tu
etul3an
etus3
eu1
e1u
eu3d
e3ud
eu3k
eu3l
e3um
euma3
eu3r
e3ur
euri3t
e3us
eu3t
e3ut
eute3
e1v
eva3
e3va
e3ve
evi3
e3vi
evo3
e1w
e3wa
ewa1
ewah3
e3we
ewi3
e3wi
e3wo
e1y
e3ya
e3ye
e3yo
e1z
e3za
ezo3
e3zo
1fa
3fa.
3faa
fa3a
3fad
fa3d
fae3
3fag
fagi3
3fah
3fak
fakat3
3fal
fa3m
fami3
f3an.
fana3
3fana
3fani
3far
3fas
fa3s
fasi3l
3fat
fau3
3fau
1fe
3fe.
fede3
fe3i
fek3
3fek
fek1
3fel
3fem
fe3m
fe1m
3fen
feo3
3fer
feren3
feren1
fermen3
3fes
3fet
fi1
1fi
3fi.
3fia
fi3a
fib1
3fid
fi3d
3fik
fi3k
fika3
fika1
3fil
fi3l
fili3
3fin
fio3
fi3o
3fir
3fis
fisi3
3fit
f1k
f3ka
1fl
fla3
fla1
3flav
3fle
flek3
flo3
3flo
flu3
3flu
flu1
fo1
1fo
3fob
fo3b
3fof
fo3f
3fog
fo3g
3fok
fo3k
3fol
fo3l
fo3m
3fon
3for
for1
fora3
forma3
3fos
fos3f
3fot
fo3t
foto3
1fr
3fra
frag3
frak3
fre3
3fre
freku3
fri3
3fro
fron3
fruk3
frukto3
f1s
f3si
f1t
f3ta
ftal3
ftal1
f3te
1fu
3fun
funda3
3fur
3fus
fu3s
fu1s
fusi3
3ga.
1ga.
3gaa
ga3a
1gaa
ga3b
ga3c
g1ac
g3acu
ga3d
3gadai
3gadin
ga3f
ga3g
3gaga
1gaga
g3agi
g3agun
gah3
1gah
3gaha
ga3j
g3ajar
1gak.
1gaka
3gakan
gako3
g3aks
g3aku
g1aku
1gal
3gal.
3gala.
galak3
3galak
g3alam
3galan
3gali.
g3alin
g3alir
gali3s
3galka
galva3
1gam
3gam.
3gama.
3gamak
3gaman.
g3amana
g3amb
g1amb
gambar3
3gambar
3gamet
3gami
gamit3
gamit1
g1amp
g3ampu
g1an
g3an.
3gana.
gana3nga
g3anc
1gand
3ganda.
3gandaka
3gande
1gang
3gang.
3gangan
g3angg
g3angkat
g3angku
g3angsu
3gangt
1gani
3ganis
g3anjun
gan3s
g3antar
3ganti.
3gantun
g3anu
ga3o
3gapai
3gapan
1gapan
g3apun
1gar
ga1r
3gara.
3garaa
3garan.
garis3
3garis
3gark
3garong
g3ars
3garuk
1gas
3gas.
g3asam
3gasan
3gasi.
3gask
g3asu
g1asu
3gatif
gat3inga
3gator
3gaul
ga3ul
ga3w
g3awas
ga3y
3gayut
g1b
gba3
g3ba
gba1
g3be
g3bi
g3bu
g1c
g3ca
g3co
g1d
gda3
g3da
g3de
g3du
ge1
1ge
3ge.
ge3a
ge3b
ge3c
ge3d
g3edar
ge3g
3gega
ge3j
g3eks
g1eks
3gel
ge3l
gelap3
gela3t
gelin3
gelin1
gelom3
gem1
gemas3
3gembl
3gembo
3geme
g3empo
3gen
genera3
g3entak
geo3
3geo
ge3o
ge3p
ge3r
3ger.
3gera.
gerah3
3geray
3gerb
gerga3
gerom3
geru3m
ge3s
3gese
3gesti.
3get.
3getar
ge3v
g3eva
g1g
g3ga
gga3sa
gge3
g3ge
g3gi
g3gl
g3go
ggok3
g3gr
g3gu
gguk3
ggup3
ggut3
g1h
g3ha
gha1
gha3ng
gha3p
g3he
ghi3
g3hi
ghi1
ghim3
g3ho
ghu3
g3hu
1gi
3gi.
3gia
gi3a
gi3b
gi3d
g1id
g3ida
g3ide
3gig
gi3g
gih3
gih1
3giha
3gik.
g3iku
3gil.
3gili
gim3
g3im
gim1
g1im
gin1
3ginal
g3ind
g1ind
3gine
3ging.
gini3
3gini.
g3inisi
g3inj
g3int
g1int
gi3o
gi3p
gi1r
gi3ra
3gis.
3gism
3gistr
3gitas
gita3s
giti3m
